Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.040

Adjournment of proceedings—Further notice.

The court may, upon application of the petitioner or of any owner of said real estate, or any person interested therein, for reasonable cause, adjourn the proceedings from time to time, and may order new or further notice to be given to any party whose interests may be affected by such proceedings.

[ 1909 p 373 s 4; 1903 c 111 s 4; RRS s 909.]